apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
    <pardef n="mon/ey__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ey</l>
        <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eys</l>
        <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ies</l>
        <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>eys'</l>
        <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ies'</l>
        <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/an__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>an</l>
        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>en</l>
        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bass__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>es</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>es'</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bus__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>es</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ses</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>es'</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ses'</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="politics__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>'s</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>'</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="wol/f__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>f</l>
        <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ves</l>
        <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ves'</l>
        <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>fs</l>
        <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="li/fe__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>fe</l>
        <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ves</l>
        <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ves'</l>
        <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="p/erson__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>erson</l>
        <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eople</l>
        <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ersons</l>
        <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ephemeri/s__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>des</l>
        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>des'</l>
        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cyclop/s__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>es</l>
        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ses</l>
        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="staff__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>'s</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>s'</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="child__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ren</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/ouse__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ouse</l>
        <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ice</l>
        <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/oot__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>oot</l>
        <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eet</l>
        <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>oot</l>
        <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="br/other__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>other</l>
        <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ethren</l>
        <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>others</l>
        <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="stimul/us__n">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>us</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>us</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

                            <e lm="person of action" i=""><i>p</i><par n="p/erson__n"/><p><l><b/>of<b/>action</l><r><g><b/>of<b/>action</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="deceitful salesman" i=""><i>deceitful<b/>salesm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="Japanese" i=""><i>Japanese</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="math" i=""><i>math</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="brother" i=""><i>br</i><par n="br/other__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="bus" i=""><i>bus</i><par n="bus__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="child" i=""><i>child</i><par n="child__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="person, people" i=""><i>p</i><par n="p/erson__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="foot" i=""><i>f</i><par n="f/oot__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="fish" i=""><i>fish</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="flatus" i=""><i>flat</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="genius" i=""><i>geni</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="gentleman" i=""><i>gentlem</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="grandchild" i=""><i>grandchild</i><par n="child__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="insignia" i=""><i>insignia</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="knife" i=""><i>kni</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="life" i=""><i>li</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="mouse" i=""><i>m</i><par n="m/ouse__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="midwife" i=""><i>midwi</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="policeman" i=""><i>policem</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="shelf" i=""><i>shel</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="staff" i=""><i>staff</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="statesman" i=""><i>statesm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="stimulus" i=""><i>stimul</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="handkerchief" i=""><i>handkerchie</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="money" i=""><i>mon</i><par n="mon/ey__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="wife" i=""><i>wi</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="bonus" i=""><i>bonus</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
			    <e lm="ethics" i=""><i>ethics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="werewolf" i=""><i>werewol</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="marquess" i=""><i>marquess</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="elected" i=""><i>elected</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="jellyfish" i=""><i>jellyfish</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="turkey" i=""><i>turk</i><par n="mon/ey__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="dwarf" i=""><i>dwar</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="monkey" i=""><i>monk</i><par n="mon/ey__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="ramen" i=""><i>ramen</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="penknife" i=""><i>penkni</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="salmon" i=""><i>salmon</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="dormouse" i=""><i>dorm</i><par n="m/ouse__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="radius" i=""><i>radi</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="ephemeris" i=""><i>ephemeri</i><par n="ephemeri/s__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="aerobatics" i=""><i>aerobatics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="airwoman" i=""><i>airwom</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="assiduousness" i=""><i>assiduousness</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="elf" i=""><i>el</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
